New Jersey, session 221, A1602.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due for the taxable year under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., for the taxpayers costs of care for each child enrolled at a child care center licensed pursuant to the Child Care Center Licensing Act, P.L.1983, c.492 (C.30:5B‑1 et seq.). b.    The amount of the credit shall be equal to: 15 percent of the amount the taxpayer paid during the taxable year to the child care center for the care of each taxpayers child less than six years of age, if that child care center had a Grow NJ Kids  rating of three stars during the taxable year; 17.5 percent of the amount the taxpayer paid during the taxable year to the child care center for the care of each taxpayers child less than six years of age, if that child care center had a Grow NJ Kids  rating of four stars during the taxable year; and 20 percent of the amount the taxpayer paid during the taxable year to the child care center for the care of each taxpayers child less than six years of age, if that child care center had a Grow NJ Kids rating of five stars during the taxable year. If a child care center had more than one rating during the taxable year, the higher rating shall be used when calculating the credit allowed. c.     For purposes of this credit, a child shall be considered less than six years of age in any tax year in which the child is less than six years of age at any point during the taxable year. d.    (1) For a taxpayer who has gross income for the taxable year of less than $25,000: if the amount of credit allowed pursuant to this section for the taxable year, together with any other payments or credits against the tax, reduces the tax liability otherwise due for the taxable year to zero, any amount of credit remaining shall be paid to the taxpayer as a refund of an overpayment of tax pursuant to N.J.S.54A:9-7; provided, however, that subsection (f) of that section, concerning the allowance of interest, shall not apply. (2)  For a taxpayer who has gross income for the taxable year of $25,000 of more: if the amount of credit allowed pursuant to this section for the taxable year, together with any other payments or credits against the tax, reduces the tax liability otherwise due for the taxable year to zero, any amount of credit remaining shall be carried forward to the next taxable year. No portion of a credit shall carry forward to more than the next taxable year following the year in which the credit is first allowed. e.     The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the gross income tax for the taxable year shall be as prescribed by the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. f.     If a taxpayer is eligible for a credit pursuant to this section and eligible for a credit pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2018, c.45 (C.54A:4-17) in the same taxable year, the taxpayer shall be allowed either credit, but not both. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning January 1 next following enactment.